Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-103
Declaration as city of the primary class; government pending reorganization.

The government of a city of the first class which is declared to be a city of the primary class pursuant to section 15-102 shall continue in authority from the date of such declaration until reorganization as a city of the primary class.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 3, p. 71;

R.S.1913, § 4406;

C.S.1922, § 3782;

C.S.1929, § 15-103;

R.S.1943, § 15-103;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 6.